Utah statutes.
70A-2-710.   Seller's incidental damages.
Incidental damages to an aggrieved seller include any commercially reasonable
charges, expenses or commissions incurred in stopping delivery, in the
transportation, care and custody of goods after the buyer's breach, in
connection with return or resale of the goods or otherwise resulting from the
breach.
